Massachusetts, session 194th, H2443.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 7AA of Chapter 90 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the 
following subsection at the end thereof: 
(1) No person or persons shall be allowed to smoke, as defined in Section 22, Chapter 
270 of the General Laws, in a motor vehicle in which a child is required by the provisions of this 
chapter to be secured by a child passenger restraint.  
An operator or passenger of a motor vehicle who violates the provisions of this section 
shall be subject to a fine of $100.  
Law enforcement agencies shall enforce the provisions of this section. A law 
enforcement officer may not search or inspect a motor vehicle, its contents, the driver, or a 

of 2 10 passenger solely because of a violation of this section. For a period of 90 days following the 
effective date of this act, any law enforcement official who stops a motorist solely because of a 
violation of this section shall not issue a citation but shall issue a verbal or written warning.     
A violation of this section shall not be used as evidence of contributory negligence in any 
civil action.  
A person who receives a citation for a violation of any of the provisions of this section 
may contest such citation pursuant to section three of chapter ninety C. A violation of this 
section shall not be deemed to be a conviction of a moving violation of the motor vehicle laws 
for the purpose of determining surcharges on motor vehicle premiums pursuant to section one 
hundred and thirteen B of chapter one hundred and seventy-five.